Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.565

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.31.567 through 43.31.583:

(1) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(2) "Director" means the director of commerce.

(3) "Early learning facility" means a facility providing regularly scheduled care for a group of children one month of age through twelve years of age for periods of less than twenty-four hours.

[2021 c 130 s 4; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: "The legislature finds that there is a significant and critical need for additional early learning facilities to meet the state's commitment to providing high quality early learning opportunities to low-income children, including the legal mandate to provide preschool opportunities through the early childhood education and assistance program to all eligible children by 2023.

The legislature further finds that private and public partnerships and investments are critical to meeting the need for increased classrooms necessary to deliver high quality early learning opportunities to low-income children across Washington.

The legislature intends to provide state financial assistance to leverage local and private resources to enable early childhood education and assistance program contractors and child care providers to expand, remodel, purchase, or construct early learning facilities and classrooms necessary to support state-funded early learning opportunities for low-income children." [2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 1.]

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [July 6, 2017]." [2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 15.]